Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201858-844
Bonds issued to purchase securities of eligible institution;
provisions applicable.

In addition to any other
methods of financing authorized in the Nebraska Educational, Health, and Social Services Finance Authority
Act, the authority may finance the cost of a project or program, refund outstanding
indebtedness, or reimburse advances from an endowment or any similar fund
of an eligible institution as authorized
by section 58-834 by issuing its bonds
for the purpose of purchasing the securities of the
eligible institution. Any such
securities shall have the same principal amounts, maturities, and interest
rates as the bonds being issued, may be secured by a first mortgage lien on
or security interest in any real or personal property, subject to such exceptions
as the authority may approve and created by a mortgage or security instrument
satisfactory to the authority, and may be insured or guaranteed by others.
Any such bonds shall be secured by a pledge of such securities under the trust indenture securing such bonds,
shall be payable solely out of the payments to be made on such securities,
and shall not exceed in principal amount the cost of such project or program,
the refunding of such indebtedness, or reimbursement of such advances as determined
by the eligible institution and approved
by the authority. In other respects any such bonds shall be subject to the
act, including sections 58-841
and 58-842, and the trust indenture
securing such bonds may contain any of the provisions set forth
in section 58-843 as the authority may
consider appropriate.

If a project is financed pursuant to this section, the title
to such project shall remain in the eligible institution owning such project, subject to the lien of the mortgage
or security interest, if any, securing the securities then being purchased,
and there shall be no lease of such facility between the authority and such eligible institution.

Section 58-840 shall not apply to
any project financed pursuant to this section, but the authority shall return
the securities purchased through the issuance of bonds pursuant to this section
to the eligible institution issuing
such securities when such bonds have been fully paid and retired or when adequate
provision has been made to pay and retire such bonds fully and all other conditions
of the trust indenture securing such bonds
have been satisfied and any lien established pursuant to this section has
been released in accordance with the provisions of the trust indenture.

Laws 1981, LB 321, § 41;

Laws 1993, LB 465, § 21;

R.S.1943, (1994), § 79-2941;

Laws 1995, LB 5, § 41;

R.S.1943, (2008), § 85-1741;

Laws 2013, LB170, § 44.